Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.020

Articles—Contents.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth;

(1) The names of the persons so associating themselves together, their places of residence and the name and location of the lodge, chapter, or society to which they severally belong;

(2) The corporate name assumed by the corporation and the duration of the same if limited;

(3) The purpose of the association, which shall be to provide, maintain and operate a building or buildings to be used for fraternal and social purposes, and for the benefit of the several bodies represented in such association;

(4) The place where the corporation proposes to have its principal place of business;

(5) The amount of capital stock and the par value thereof per share, if it shall be organized as a joint stock company.

[ 1927 c 190 s 2; RRS s 3887-2.]